Utah statutes.
78B-1-110.   Limitations on jury service.

In any two-year period, a person may not be required:

(1)  to serve on more than one grand jury;

(2)  to serve as both a grand and trial juror; or

(3)  to attend court for prospective jury service as a trial juror more than one court day, except if necessary to complete service in a particular case.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

